Illinois, session 104th, HB5393.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1002 and 3009 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 130/1002)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1501-2)7    Sec. 1002. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the 9meanings ascribed to them:10    "Advertisement" means any printed or published material, 11audiovisual material and descriptive literature of the limited 12health care plan used in direct mail, newspapers, magazines, 13radio scripts, television scripts, billboards and similar 14displays; and any descriptive literature or sales aids of all 15kinds disseminated by a representative of the limited health 16care plan for presentation to the public including, but not 17limited to, circulars, leaflets, booklets, depictions, 18illustrations, form letters and prepared sales presentations.19    "Copayment" means the amount that an enrollee must pay in 20order to receive a specific service that is not fully prepaid.21    "Director" means the Director of Insurance.22    "Enrollee" means an individual, including a dependent, who 23is entitled to limited health services pursuant to a contract   HB5393 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1with an entity authorized to provide or arrange for those 2services under this Act who has been enrolled in a limited 3health care plan.4    "Evidence of coverage" means any certificate, agreement or 5contract issued to an enrollee setting out the coverage to 6which that enrollee is entitled in exchange for a per capita 7prepaid sum.8    "Group contract" means a contract for limited health 9services which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a 10specified group.11    "In-plan covered services" means covered limited health 12services obtained from providers who are employed by, under 13contract with, referred by, or otherwise affiliated with the 14LHSO and emergency services.15    "Limited health care plan" means any arrangement whereby 16an organization undertakes to provide or arrange for and, pay 17for or reimburse the cost of any limited health services from 18providers selected by the limited health service organization 19and such arrangement consists of arranging for or the 20provision of such limited health services on a per capita or 21fixed prepaid basis, as distinguished from mere 22indemnification against the cost of such limited services on a 23per capita prepaid basis through insurance except as otherwise 24provided under Section 3009.25    "Limited health service" means dental care services, 26vision care services, pharmaceutical services, podiatric care   HB5393 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1services, and such other services as may be determined by the 2Director to be limited health services. "Limited health 3service" does not include hospital, medical, surgical, or 4emergency services, except as these services are provided 5incident to the limited health services set forth in this 6definition ambulance care services, dental care services, 7vision care services, pharmaceutical services, clinical 8laboratory services, and podiatric care services. Limited 9health service shall not include hospital, medical, surgical 10or emergency services except when those services are essential 11to the delivery of the limited health service. Essential 12hospital, medical, surgical, or emergency services shall be 13covered unless specifically excluded.14    "Limited health service organization" (LHSO) means any 15organization formed under the laws of this or another state to 16provide or arrange for one or more limited health care plans 17under a system which causes any part of the risk of limited 18health care delivery to be borne by the organization or its 19providers.20    "Net worth" means admitted assets, as defined in Section 211003 of this Act, minus liabilities.22    "Organization" means any insurance company or other 23corporation organized under the laws of this or another state 24for the purpose of operating one or more limited health care 25plans and doing no business other than that of a health 26maintenance organization or a limited health service   HB5393 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1organization or an insurance company. Organization does not 2include (1) any entity otherwise authorized on the effective 3date of this Act pursuant to the laws of this State either to 4provide any limited health service on a prepayment basis or to 5indemnity for any limited health service; nor does it include 6(2) any provider or other entity when providing or arranging 7for the provision of limited health services pursuant to a 8contract with a limited health service organization or with 9any entity described in (1) of this definition.10    "Out-of-plan covered services" means non-emergency, 11self-referred covered limited health services obtained from 12providers who are not otherwise employed by, under contract 13with, or otherwise affiliated with the LHSO or services 14obtained without a referral from providers who have contracted 15to provide limited health services to the enrollee on behalf 16of the limited health care plan.17    "Point-of-service product" (POS) means a group contract 18that includes both in-plan covered services and out-of-plan 19covered services as well as a POS contract in which the risk 20for out-of-plan covered services is borne through reinsurance. 21This term does not apply to indemnity benefits offered through 22an LHSO that are underwritten in whole by a licensed insurance 23carrier and offered in conjunction with the LHSO benefit 24package.25    "Provider" means any physician, dentist, health facility, 26or other person or institution which is duly licensed or   HB5393 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1otherwise authorized to deliver or furnish limited health 2services and also includes any other entity that arranges for 3the delivery or furnishing of limited health service.4    "Per capita prepaid" means a basis of payment by which a 5fixed amount of money is prepaid per individual or any other 6enrollment unit to the limited health service organization or 7for limited health services which are provided during a 8definite time period regardless of the frequency or extent of 9the services rendered, except for copayments of a fixed amount 10by the limited health service organization.11    "Subscriber" means the person whose employment or other 12status, except for family dependency, is the basis for 13entitlement to limited health services pursuant to a contract 14with an organization authorized to provide or arrange for such 15services under this Act.16    "Uncovered expense" means the cost of limited health 17services that are the obligation of a limited health service 18organization for which an enrollee may be liable in the event 19of the insolvency of the organization. Costs incurred by a 20provider who has agreed in writing not to bill enrollees, 21except for permissible supplemental charges, shall be 22considered covered expenses.23(Source: P.A. 87-1079; 88-568, eff. 8-5-94; 88-667, eff. 249-16-94.) 25    (215 ILCS 130/3009)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1503-9)  HB5393 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1    Sec. 3009. Point-of-service limited health service 2contracts. 3    (a) An LHSO that offers a POS contract: 4        (1) shall include as in-plan covered services all 5    services required by law to be provided by an LHSO; 6        (2) shall provide incentives, which shall include 7    financial incentives, for enrollees to use in-plan covered 8    services; 9        (3) shall not offer services out-of-plan without 10    providing those services on an in-plan basis; 11        (4) may limit or exclude specific types of services 12    from coverage when obtained out-of-plan; 13        (5) may include annual out-of-pocket limits and 14    lifetime maximum benefits allowances for out-of-plan 15    services that are separate from any limits or allowances 16    applied to in-plan services; 17        (6) shall include an annual maximum benefit allowance 18    not to exceed $2,500 per year that is separate from any 19    limits or allowances applied to in-plan services; 20        (6) (7) may limit the groups to which a POS product is 21    offered, however, if a POS product is offered to a group, 22    then it must be offered to all eligible members of that 23    group, when an LHSO provider is available; 24        (7) (8) shall not consider emergency services, 25    authorized referral services, or non-routine services 26    obtained out of the service area to be POS services; and   HB5393 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1        (8) (9) may treat as out-of-plan services those 2    services that an enrollee obtains from a participating 3    provider, but for which the proper authorization was not 4    given by the LHSO.5    (b) An LHSO offering a POS contract shall be subject to the 6following limitations: 7        (1) The LHSO shall not expend in any calendar quarter 8    more than 20% of its total limited health services 9    expenditures for all its members for out-of-plan covered 10    services, unless otherwise allowed under this subsection. 11        (2) If the amount specified in paragraph (1) is 12    exceeded by 2% in a quarter, the LHSO shall effect 13    compliance with paragraph (1) by the end of the following 14    quarter. 15        (3) If compliance with the amount specified in 16    paragraph (1) is not demonstrated in the LHSO's next 17    quarterly report, the LHSO may not offer the POS contract 18    to new groups or include the POS option in the renewal of 19    an existing group until compliance with the amount 20    specified in paragraph (1) is demonstrated or otherwise 21    allowed by the Director. 22        (4) Any LHSO failing, without just cause, to comply 23    with the provisions of this subsection shall be required, 24    after notice and hearing, to pay a penalty of $250 for each 25    day out of compliance, to be recovered by the Director of 26    Insurance. Any penalty recovered shall be paid into the   HB5393 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1    General Revenue Fund. The Director may reduce the penalty 2    if the LHSO demonstrates to the Director that the 3    imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial 4    hardship to the LHSO.5    This subsection does not apply in any calendar quarter in 6which an LHSO satisfies the minimum capital and surplus 7requirements applicable to a life, accident, and health 8insurance company as outlined in Section 13 of the Illinois 9Insurance Code. 10    (c) Any LHSO that offers a POS product shall: 11        (1) File a quarterly financial statement detailing 12    compliance with the requirements of subsection (b). 13        (2) Track out-of-plan POS utilization separately from 14    in-plan or non-POS out-of-plan emergency care, referral 15    care, and urgent care out of the service area utilization. 16        (3) Record out-of-plan utilization in a manner that 17    will permit such utilization and cost reporting as the 18    Director may, by regulation, require. 19        (4) Demonstrate to the Director's satisfaction that 20    the LHSO has the fiscal, administrative, and marketing 21    capacity to control its POS enrollment, utilization, and 22    costs so as not to jeopardize the financial security of 23    the LHSO. 24        (5) Maintain the deposit required by subsection (b) of 25    Section 2006 in addition to any other deposit required 26    under this Act.  HB5393 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18114 BAB 31553 b1    (d) An LHSO shall not issue a POS contract until it has 2filed and had approved by the Director a plan to comply with 3the provisions of this Section. The compliance plan shall at a 4minimum include provisions demonstrating that the LHSO will do 5all of the following: 6        (1) Design the benefit levels and conditions of 7    coverage for in-plan covered services and out-of-plan 8    covered services as required by this Article. 9        (2) Provide or arrange for the provision of adequate 10    systems to: 11            (A) process and pay claims for all out-of-plan 12        covered services; 13            (B) meet the requirements for a POS contract set 14        forth in this Section and any additional requirements 15        that may be set forth by the Director; and 16            (C) generate accurate data and financial and 17        regulatory reports on a timely basis so that the 18        Department can evaluate the LHSO's experience with the 19        POS contract and monitor compliance with POS contract 20        provisions. 21        (3) Comply initially and on an ongoing basis with the 22    requirements of subsections (b) and (c).23    (e) A limited health service organization that offers a 24POS contract must comply with Sections 356w and 356x of the 25Illinois Insurance Code.26(Source: P.A. 90-741, eff. 1-1-99.)